New Jersey, session 222, S3998.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Forms, applications, and other materials required for the rent, lease, sale, or resale of an age-restricted dwelling unit shall be made available by mail and email upon the request of a prospective resident.  A person soliciting applications for the rent, lease, sale, or resale of a dwelling which is age-restricted, in compliance with the housing for older persons exception from the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, Pub.L.100-430 (42 U.S.C. ss.3601 et seq.), shall, upon the request of a prospective resident, provide a copy of each required application form to the prospective resident by mail or email, as requested. 2.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt the rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following enactment.